Georgia, session 2025_26, HB273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 5C of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to title ad valorem
tax on motor vehicles, is amended in Code Section 48-5C-1, relating to alternative ad
valorem taxation of motor vehicles and title ad valorem tax fee, by revising paragraph (2) as
follows:
"(2) 'Immediate family member' means spouse, parent, child, sibling, grandparent, or
grandchild."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
H. B. 273
- 1 -

LC 50 1021
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 273
- 2 -